src/fst/apertium-sty.twol
Alphabet
 А Ә Б В Г Ғ Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Ҡ Л М Н Ң О Ө П Р С Т У Ү Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
 а ә б в г ғ д е ё ж з и й к ҡ л м н ң о ө п р с т у ү ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
 %{A%}:а %{O%}:о %{E%}:е %{I%}:е %{i%}:е
 %{L%}:л %{K%}:к %{G%}:г %{T%}:т %{s%}:с

%>:0 % ;

Sets

Vow = А Ә Е И О Ө У Ү Ы Э Ю Я
      а ә е и о ө у ү ы э ю я ;  

Cnst = Б В Г Ғ Д Ж З Й К Ҡ Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ь
	   б в г ғ д ж з и й к ҡ л м н ң р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ь ;

BackVow = А О У Ы
		  а о у ы ;

FrontVow = Ә Ө Ү Е Э И
		   ә ө ү е э и ;
		   
BackVowWithoutO = А У Ы
		          а у ы ;

FrontVowWithoutO = Ә Ү Е Э И
		           ә ү е э и ;

NasalCnst = Н Ң М
            н ң м ;
			
CnstVoiceless = К Ҡ Т П Ш Щ Ц Ч С Ф Х
				к ҡ т п ш щ ц ч с ф х ;
				
CnstVoiced = Б В Г Ғ Д Ж З
			 б в г ғ д ж з ;
			 
CnstSonorant = Л М Н Ң Р Й
			   л м н ң р й ;
			   

Rules
  
"Front harmony in suffixes"
%{A%}:ә <=> FrontVow: [ %{A%}: | %{L%}: | %{T%}: | %{K%}: | %{G%}: | %{I%}: | %{E%}: | %{i%}: | %{s%}: | Cnst: | %>: ]* _ ;

!"Rule 1"
!%{I%}:е <=> FrontVowWithoutO: [ %{A%}: | %{L%}: | %{T%}: | Cnst: | %>: ]* _ ;

"Rule 2"
%{I%}:ы <=> BackVowWithoutO: [ %{A%}: | %{L%}: | %{T%}: | %{s%}: | %{i%}: | Cnst: | %>: ]* _ ;

"Rule 3"
%{I%}:ө <=> ө: [ %{A%}: | %{L%}: | %{T%}: | %{I%}: | %{G%}: | %{E%}: | %{s%}: | %{i%}: | Cnst: | %>: ]* _ ;

"Rule 4"
%{I%}:о <=> о: [ %{A%}: | %{L%}: | %{T%}: | %{s%}: | %{i%}: | Cnst: | %>: ]* _ ;

"Rule 10"
%{E%}:ы <=> BackVow: [ %{L%}: | %{A%}: | %{E%}: | %{G%}: | %{T%}: | %{I%}: | %{i%}: | %{s%}: | Cnst: | %>: ]* _ ;

"Plural alternation after nasal"
%{L%}:н <=> :NasalCnst/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %{A%}: р ;

"Rule 8"
%{T%}:н <=> :NasalCnst/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %{A%}: н ; 

"Rule 5"
%{K%}:ҡ <=> BackVow: CnstVoiceless: [ %{A%}: | %{L%}: | %{E%}: | %{G%}: | %{T%}: | %{I%}: | %{i%}: | %{s%}: | %>: ]* _ ;

"Rule 6"
%{K%}:ғ <=> BackVow: [ CnstVoiced: | %{A%}: | %{L%}: | %{E%}: | %{G%}: | %{T%}: | %{I%}: | %{i%}: | %{s%}: | %>: ]* _ ;

"Rule 7"
%{K%}:г <=> FrontVow: [ CnstVoiced: | %{A%}: | %{L%}: | %{E%}: | %{G%}: | %{T%}: | %{I%}: | %{i%}: | %{s%}: | %>: ]* _ ;

"Rule 9"
%{G%}:ғ <=> BackVow: [ %{A%}: | %{L%}: | %{E%}: | %{G%}: | %{T%}: | %{I%}: | %{i%}: | %{s%}: | Cnst: | %>: ]* _ ;

"Deletion of {s} after a consonant"
%{s%}:0 <=> :Cnst/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;

"Deletion of {i} after vowels"
%{i%}:0 <=> [ :Vow - :Cnst ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;

!"Rule 10"
!%{i%}:ы <=> BackVowWithoutO: [ %>: ]* _ ;

!"Rule 11"
!%{i%}:ө <=> ө: [ %>: ]* _ ;

!"Rule 12"
!%{i%}:о <=> о: [ %>: ]* _ ;
